Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-17,102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nursing Student Loan Act:

(1) Approved nursing program means a program offered by a public or private institution in this state (a) which consists of courses of instruction in regularly scheduled classes leading to a master of science degree, a bachelor of science degree, an associate degree, or a diploma in nursing or (b) for the preparation for licensure as a licensed practical nurse available to regularly enrolled undergraduate or graduate students;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Nontraditional student means a student who has not attended classes as a regular full-time student for at least three years; and

(4) Practice of nursing has the definition found in section 38-2210.

Laws 2001, LB 468, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 490;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1191.